Tennessee, session 114, HB2496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-88-114, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(h) If a municipality or public authority is entitled to receive an allocation of sales
tax revenues pursuant to this chapter and pursuant to § 67-6-103, then the municipality
or public authority may apply such sales tax revenues from the applicable area for the
purposes authorized under this chapter or for the purposes authorized by § 67-6-103, as
determined by the municipality or public authority.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-3002, is amended by deleting
subdivision (7)(D) and substituting instead:
(D) A mixed-use development initially including a sports facility containing ten
(10) or more sports fields or a performance venue with a seating capacity of at least two
thousand five hundred (2,500), including any retail, office, hotel, apartment,
condominium, and other commercial or residential uses, and for which any portion was
located in a tourism development zone when certified, that is expected by the
municipality to require a total public and private capital investment of three hundred
million dollars ($300,000,000) or more;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2496
012496
- 1 -